Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
ARTICLE 5 COUNTY BOUNDARIES
30-5-131. Huerfano.

Beginning at the summit of Greenhorn Mountain; thence following the crest of the main range of mountains around the headwaters of the Huerfano and Cucharas rivers to the summit of the easterly of the two Spanish peaks; thence northeasterly along the dividing ridge between the waters of the Santa Clara and Apishapa rivers to the intersection of said ridge with a straight line from Corral de Toros on the Huerfano River to the Iron Springs; thence northwesterly along said line to the Corral de Toros; and thence on a straight line westerly to the place of beginning.

Source:

R.S.

p. 164, § 47.

G.L.

§ 374.

G.S.

§ 446.

R.S. 08:

§ 1112.

C.L.

§ 8592.

CSA:

C. 44, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-31.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-31.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1429, § 8, effective July 1.

30-5-132. Jackson.

Beginning at the intersection of the north boundary line of Colorado with the continental divide; thence along said divide to the point where it intersects the Medicine Bow Mountains; thence northerly along the crest of the Medicine Bow Mountains to the north boundary line of Colorado; and thence west along said Colorado boundary line to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 09:

p. 432, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8593.

CSA:

C. 44, § 35.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-32.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-32.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1430, § 9, effective July 1.

30-5-133. Jefferson.

Jefferson county is hereby bounded as follows:

Except for those portions that became part of the city and county of Broomfield on November 15, 2001, in accordance with sections 10 to 13 of article XX of the state constitution, commencing at a point where the township line between townships one and two south intersects the range line between ranges sixty-eight and sixty-nine; thence due west twenty miles; thence due south to the junction of North and South Clear creeks; thence south to the Platte river; thence down the center of said Platte river to the point where said river intersects the first correction line; thence west to the range line between ranges sixty-eight and sixty-nine; thence north to the place of beginning.

Source:

G.L.

§ 364.

G.S.

§ 439.

L. 1889:

p. 100, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1113.

C.L.

§ 8594.

CSA:

C. 44, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-33.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-33.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 640, § 4, effective April 23.

Editor's note:

Pursuant to §§ 30-6-105 to 30-6-109, inclusive, there is recorded in the office of the clerk and recorder of Park County in book 70, page 560, and in the office of the clerk and recorder of Jefferson County in book 140, page 400 (indexed in book 2 - Miscellaneous Papers - in the office of the secretary of state), a proclamation showing attachment to Park County and detachment from Jefferson County of territory described as follows:

"Beginning at the intersection of the boundary line between Park and Jefferson Counties with the center line of the South Platte River, about two miles above Lake George, thence down the said Platte River along its center line to intersection of said center line with the Second Correction Line South, thence westerly along said Correction Line to its intersection with the boundary line between Park and Jefferson Counties, thence along said boundary line to point of beginning."

30-5-134. Kiowa.

Beginning at the point of intersection of the east boundary line of Colorado with the south line of township twenty south; thence west on said township line to its intersection with the west line of range fifty-four west; thence north on said range line to the northwest corner of township twenty south, range fifty-four west; thence west on the south line of township nineteen south, range fifty-four west, to the southwest corner of said township and range; thence north on the west line of range fifty-four west to its intersection with the south line of township seventeen south; thence east on said township line to its intersection with the west line of range fifty-one west; thence north on said range line to its intersection with the south line of township sixteen south; thence east on said township line to the east boundary line of Colorado; and thence south on the Colorado boundary line to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 222, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1114.

C.L.

§ 8595.

CSA:

C. 44, § 37.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-34.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-34.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1430, § 10, effective July 1.

30-5-135. Kit Carson.

The county of Kit Carson is hereby established, with the legal capacity and functions of other counties in this state, and the boundaries are as follows:

Beginning at the northeast corner of Elbert county and running west along the north line of said Elbert county to the west line of range fifty-one, west of the sixth principal meridian; thence south on said west line of range fifty-one to the township line between townships eleven and twelve south; thence east along said township line to where it intersects the state line of Kansas; thence north on the east boundary line of Elbert county to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 225, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1115.

C.L.

§ 8596.

CSA:

C. 44, § 38.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-35.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-35.

30-5-136. Lake.

Beginning at the point on the continental divide from which the Tenmile Range departs northerly; thence on a due west line to its second intersection with the continental divide; thence westerly and then southerly along the continental divide to its intersection with the section line lying one mile north of the south line of township eleven south; thence east on section lines to an intersection with the range, known as the Mosquito Range, dividing the waters of the Arkansas and South Platte rivers; thence northerly along the crest of said range to its intersection with the continental divide; and thence northeasterly along said divide to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

L. 1879:

p. 45, § 1.

G.S.

§ 468.

R.S. 08:

§ 1116.

C.L.

§ 8597.

CSA:

C. 44, § 39.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-36.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-36.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1430, § 11, effective July 1.

30-5-137. Lake and Chaffee - names changed.

The name of the county of Lake is hereby changed to Chaffee, and the name of Carbonate county is changed to Lake county.

Source:

L. 1879:

p. 48, § 1.

G.S.

§ 469.

R.S. 08:

§ 1117.

C.L.

§ 8598.

CSA:

C. 44, § 40.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-37.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-37.

30-5-138. La Plata.

The county of La Plata shall be bounded as follows:

Commencing at a point six miles west of the mouth of Lost Trail creek, and running thence north to a point ten miles north of the thirty-eighth parallel of north latitude; thence west to the western boundary of the state; thence south along said western boundary to the southwest corner of the state; thence east along the southern boundary of the state to a point due south of the place of beginning; thence north to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 67, § 3.

G.L.

§ 379.

G.S.

§ 455.

R.S. 08:

§ 1118.

C.L.

§ 8599.

CSA:

C. 44, § 41.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-38.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-38.

30-5-139. Larimer.

Beginning at the intersection of the first standard parallel north with the east line of range sixty-eight west; thence west on said parallel to its intersection with the east line of range sixty-nine west; thence south on said range line to its intersection with the south line of township four north; thence west on said township line to its intersection with the continental divide; thence northwesterly on the continental divide to the point where it intersects the Medicine Bow Mountains; thence northwesterly along the crest of the Medicine Bow Mountains to its intersection with the north boundary line of Colorado; thence east on said north boundary line to its intersection with the east line of range sixty-eight west; and thence south to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

R.S.

p. 160, § 23.

G.L.

§ 362.

G.S.

§ 437.

R.S. 08:

§ 1119.

C.L.

§ 8600.

CSA:

C. 44, § 42.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-39.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-39.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1430, § 12, effective July 1.

30-5-140. Las Animas.

The boundaries of the county of Las Animas are as follows:

Commencing at the southeast corner of the county of Pueblo; thence running due west to the Iron Springs; thence westerly along the southern line of Pueblo county, to the dividing ridge between the waters of the Apishapa and Santa Clara rivers; thence southward up the said dividing ridge to the summit of the easterly of the two Spanish peaks; thence westerly along the summit of the mountains to the eastern boundary of the county of Costilla; thence south along said eastern boundary of Costilla county to the southern line of the state; thence east to the southeast corner of the state; thence north to the place of beginning.

Source:

R.S.

p. 164, § 48.

G.L.

§ 375.

G.S.

§ 447.

R.S. 08:

§ 1120.

C.L.

§ 8601.

CSA:

C. 44, § 43.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-40.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-40.

30-5-141. Lincoln.

Beginning at the intersection of the first standard parallel south with the west line of range fifty-six west; thence south on said range line to its intersection with the second standard parallel south; thence west on said parallel to the northwest corner of section six, township eleven south, range fifty-six west; thence south on the west line of range fifty-six west to its intersection with the south line of township thirteen south; thence west on said township line to its intersection with the west line of range fifty-nine west; thence south on said range line to its intersection with the south line of township seventeen south; thence east on said township line to its intersection with the west line of range fifty-five west; thence south on said range line to the southwest corner of township seventeen south, range fifty-five west; thence east on the south line of said township and range to the southeast corner thereof; thence north on the east line of range fifty-five west to the southwest corner of township seventeen south, range fifty-four west; thence east on the south line of township seventeen south to the southeast corner of township seventeen south, range fifty-two west; thence north on the east line of range fifty-two west to its intersection with the third standard parallel south; thence east on said parallel to the southeast corner of township fifteen south, range fifty-two west; thence north on the east line of range fifty-two west to its intersection with the second standard parallel south; thence east on said parallel to the southeast corner of township ten south, range fifty-two west; thence north on the east line of range fifty-two west to its intersection with the first standard parallel south; and thence west on said parallel to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 234, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1121.

C.L.

§ 8602.

CSA:

C. 44, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-41.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-41.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1431, § 13, effective July 1.

30-5-142. Logan.

Beginning at the intersection of the east line of range forty-eight west with the north boundary line of Colorado; thence west on said north boundary line to its intersection with the west line of range fifty-five west; thence south on said range line to the southwest corner of township nine north, range fifty-five west; thence west on the north line of township eight north, range fifty-five west, to the northwest corner of said township and range; thence south on the west line of range fifty-five west to its intersection with the south line of township seven north; thence east on said township line to its intersection with the west line of range fifty-four west; thence south on said range line to its intersection with the south line of township six north; thence east on said township line to its intersection with the east line of range forty-eight west; thence north on said range line to the northeast corner of township eight north, range forty-eight west; thence east on the south line of township nine north, range forty-eight west, to the southwest corner of said township and range; and thence north on the east line of range forty-eight west to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 247, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1122.

C.L.

§ 8603.

CSA:

C. 44, § 45.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-42.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-42.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1431, § 14, effective July 1.

30-5-143. Mesa.

So much of the county of Gunnison as is included within the following described boundaries shall be set apart and is hereby established as a county, with the legal capacity and functions of other counties of this state, to be called the county of Mesa:

Beginning at the northwest corner of Pitkin county, and running thence south along and with the western line of Pitkin county to the divide between the waters of the Grand river, now the Colorado river, and the north fork of the Gunnison river; thence southwesterly along and with said divide to the southwestern extremity of the Grand Mesa; thence southwesterly to the mouth of the Rio Dominguez; thence due south to the parallel of thirty-eight degrees and thirty minutes of north latitude; thence west to the western boundary line of the state of Colorado; thence north along said boundary line to the northern boundary line of Gunnison county; and thence east along said northern boundary line of Gunnison county to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 133, § 1.

G.S.

§ 476.

R.S. 08:

§ 1123.

C.L.

§ 8604.

CSA:

C. 44, § 46.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-43.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-43.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1172, § 84, effective August 10.

30-5-144. Mineral.

Beginning at the intersection of the east line of range two east with the south line of township thirty-seven north; thence north on said range line to its intersection with the south line of township forty north, range two east; thence east on said township line to the southeast corner of said township and range; thence north on the east line of range two east to its intersection with the crest of the La Garita Mountains; thence northwesterly along the said crest to its intersection with the continental divide; thence westerly along the continental divide to its intersection with the west line of range two west; thence south on said range line to its intersection with the south line of township forty north, range two west; thence east on said township line to the northwest corner of township thirty-nine north, range two west; thence south on the west line of range two west to its intersection with the south line of township thirty-seven north; and thence east on said township line to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the New Mexico principal meridian.

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 94, § 1.

L. 1895:

p. 205, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1124.

C.L.

§ 8605.

CSA:

C. 44, § 47.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-44.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-44.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1432, § 15, effective July 1.

30-5-145. Moffat.

All that part of Routt county as is included within the following described boundaries shall be set apart and is hereby established as a county, to be called the county of Moffat:

Beginning at a point on the north boundary of the state of Colorado at a point where said state line is intersected by the range line between ranges eighty-eight and eighty-nine west of the sixth principal meridian, known as the eleventh guide meridian; thence south on said range line to its intersection with the township line between township seven and eight; thence west on said township line to the section line between sections three and four, in township seven north, range eighty-nine west; thence south on said section line to the northeast corner of section twenty-eight in said township seven north, range eighty-nine west; thence west along the north line of sections twenty-eight, twenty-nine and thirty, in township seven north, range eighty-nine west of the sixth principal meridian to its intersection with the range line between ranges eighty-nine and ninety; thence south on said range line to its intersection with the north line of Rio Blanco county; thence west along the said north line of Rio Blanco county to its intersection with the line between the state of Utah and the state of Colorado; thence north on the said line between the state of Utah and the state of Colorado to the northwest corner of the state of Colorado; thence east on the line between the state of Wyoming and the state of Colorado to the point of beginning.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 516, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8606.

CSA:

C. 44, § 48.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-45.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-45.

30-5-146. Montezuma.

The county of Montezuma is hereby established, with the legal capacity and functions of other counties of this state, and the boundaries are as follows:

Beginning at the southwest corner of La Plata county, in the state of Colorado, and running thence east along the southern boundary line of said La Plata county to a point on the apex of the ridge dividing the waters of the Rio Mancos from the waters of the Rio La Plata; thence in a northeasterly direction along the apex of said ridge to the southern boundary line of Dolores county, in said state of Colorado; thence west along said southern boundary line of Dolores county to the eastern boundary line of the territory of Utah; thence south along said eastern boundary line of Utah to the place of beginning; and including all that portion of La Plata county drained by the waters of the Mancos river, Bear creek and Dolores river.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 262, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1125.

C.L.

§ 8607.

CSA:

C. 44, § 49.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-46.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-46.

30-5-147. Montrose.

The county of Montrose is hereby established with the legal capacity and functions of other counties in this state, and with boundaries as follows:

Beginning at a point on parallel one hundred and seven degrees and thirty minutes two miles south of the third correction line extended west; thence west to a point due south of the mouth of the Rio Dominguez; thence south to parallel thirty-eight degrees and thirty minutes; thence west along said parallel to the west line of the state; thence south along said line to the northwest corner of Ouray county; thence east along said line to parallel one hundred and eight degrees of west longitude; thence north along said last named parallel to a point ten miles due north of the north line of Ouray county; thence east to parallel one hundred and seven degrees and thirty minutes; thence north along said parallel to the point of beginning.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 136, § 1.

G.S.

§ 477.

R.S. 08:

§ 1126.

C.L.

§ 8608.

CSA:

C. 44, § 50.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-47.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-47.

30-5-148. Morgan.

So much of the county of Weld as is included in the following described boundaries shall be set apart and is hereby established as a county, with the legal capacity and functions of other counties of this state, to be called the county of Morgan:

Beginning at the southeast corner of Weld county, and running thence west along the south line of Weld county to a point at the west line of range sixty, west of the sixth principal meridian; thence north, along the west line of said range sixty, to a point on said range line at the north line of township six, north of range sixty, west; thence east, along said north line of township six, north, and continuing on said course to a point on the east line of said county of Weld and the west line of range fifty-four; thence south, along the east boundary line of said Weld county, to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 267, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1127.

C.L.

§ 8609.

CSA:

C. 44, § 51.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-48.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-48.

30-5-149. Otero.

Beginning at the intersection of the south line of township twenty-seven south with the west line of range fifty-nine west; thence north on the west line of range fifty-nine west to the northwest corner of township twenty-six south, range fifty-nine west; thence west on the south line of township twenty-five south, range fifty-nine west, to the southwest corner of said township and range; thence north on the west line of range fifty-nine west to its intersection with the center of the Arkansas River; thence east and southeasterly with the center and meanderings of said river to its intersection with the north line of section twenty-eight, township twenty-two south, range fifty-seven west; thence east on section lines to the west line of range fifty-five west; thence north on said range line to its intersection with the north line of township twenty-two south; thence east on said township line to its intersection with the west line of range fifty-four west; thence north on said range line to its intersection with the fourth standard parallel south; thence east on said parallel to its intersection with the east line of range fifty-four west; thence south on said range line to the southeast corner of township twenty-five south, range fifty-four west; thence west on the north line of township twenty-six south, range fifty-four west, to the northeast corner of said township and range; thence south on the east line of range fifty-four west to its intersection with the south line of township twenty-seven south; and thence west on said township line to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 281, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1128.

C.L.

§ 8610.

CSA:

C. 44, § 52.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-49.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-49.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1432, § 16, effective July 1.

30-5-150. Ouray.

The county of Ouray is hereby created, with the legal capacity and functions of other counties in this state, and shall embrace all that territory drained by the Uncompahgre river and its tributaries south of thirty-eight degrees and twenty minutes north latitude and north of the San Juan county line.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 139, § 1.

G.S.

§ 478.

R.S. 08:

§ 1129.

C.L.

§ 8611.

CSA:

C. 44, § 53.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-50.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-50.

30-5-151. Ouray and Montrose - boundary.

That portion of the western boundary line of the county of Ouray and that portion of the eastern boundary line of the county of Montrose lying between the northwest corner of the county of Ouray and the northern boundary line of the county of San Miguel, is hereby fixed and established as follows:

Beginning at the northwest corner of the southwest quarter of the northwest quarter of section eighteen, township forty-seven north, range eleven west, New Mexico principal meridian which point is the northwest corner of Ouray county; thence south three quarters of a mile to the southwest corner of section eighteen, township forty-seven north, range eleven west; thence east one-half mile to the southwest corner of the southeast quarter of section eighteen, township forty-seven north, range eleven west; thence south to the center of section nineteen, township forty-seven north, range eleven west; thence east one mile to the center of section twenty, township forty-seven north, range eleven west; thence south two miles to the center of section thirty-two, township forty-seven north, range eleven west; thence one mile to the center of section thirty-three, township forty-seven north, range eleven west; thence south two miles to center of section nine, township forty-six north, range eleven west; thence east four miles to center of section seven, township forty-six north, range ten west; thence south one-half mile to the southwest corner of the southeast quarter of said section seven; thence east one and one-half miles to northeast corner of section seventeen, township forty-six north, range ten west; thence south one mile to southwest corner of section sixteen, township forty-six north, range ten west; thence east one mile to southeast corner of section sixteen, township forty-six north, range ten west; thence south one-half mile to the southwest corner of the northwest quarter of section twenty-two, township forty-six north, range ten west; thence east one mile to southeast corner of the northeast quarter of section twenty-two, township forty-six north, range ten west; thence south one-half mile to southeast corner of section twenty-two, township forty-six north, range ten west; thence east one-half mile to northeast corner of the northwest quarter of section twenty-six, township forty-six north, range ten west; thence south three miles to southeast corner of the southwest quarter of section two, township forty-five north, range ten west; thence west one-half mile to northwest corner of section eleven, township forty-five north, range ten west; thence south one and one-half miles to southwest corner of the northwest quarter of section fourteen, township forty-five north, range ten west; which is the north boundary line of San Miguel county.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 140, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8612.

CSA:

C. 44, § 54.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-51.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-51.

30-5-152. Ouray and San Miguel - boundary.

The state engineer, through the county surveyors of Ouray and San Miguel counties, within six months after this section becomes effective, shall designate the county line between the counties of Ouray and San Miguel, beginning at a point which is the southeast corner of Montrose county, the same being identical with the one-quarter corner between sections fourteen and fifteen, township forty-five north, range ten west, New Mexico principal meridian; thence west one mile to the one-quarter corner of sections fifteen and sixteen; thence south one-half mile to the corner of sections fifteen, sixteen, twenty-one and twenty-two; thence east three-quarters of a mile to the northwest corner of the northeast quarter of the northeast quarter of section twenty-two; thence south two miles to the southwest corner of the southeast quarter of the southeast quarter, section twenty-seven; thence east one-quarter mile to the corner of sections twenty-six, twenty-seven, thirty-four and thirty-five; all in township forty-five north, range ten west, New Mexico principal meridian; thence east three miles to the corner of sections twenty-nine, thirty, thirty-one and thirty-two, township forty-five north, range nine west, New Mexico principal meridian; thence south one mile to the southwest corner of section thirty-two on the eleventh correction line; all in township forty-five north, range nine west, New Mexico principal meridian; thence along the eleventh correction line to the northeast corner of section six, township forty-four north, range nine west, New Mexico principal meridian; thence west along the north line of section six to the northwest corner of lot one of said section; thence south to the southwest corner of the southeast quarter of the southeast quarter, section six; thence west one-quarter mile to the southwest corner of the southeast quarter of section six; thence south two miles to the southwest corner of the southeast quarter of section eighteen; all in township forty-four north of range nine west; thence east or west to the watershed hereinbefore established as the boundary line between Ouray and San Miguel counties.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 118, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8613.

CSA:

C. 44, § 55.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-52.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-52.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 816, § 1, effective March 16.

30-5-153. Park.

Park county: Commencing at a point where the second correction line south intersects the Platte river; thence south to the third correction line south; thence west to the summit of the snowy range, east of the Arkansas river; thence in a northerly direction along the divide between the Arkansas and Platte rivers, and around the headwaters of the Platte river and its tributaries; thence easterly along the snowy range dividing the waters of the Platte from the waters of the Blue, to the point of intersection with the first correction line south; thence east on said correction line to the western boundary of Jefferson county; thence south on said boundary to the Platte river; thence up the center of said river to the place of beginning.

Source:

R.S.

p. 161, § 33.

G.L.

§ 367.

G.S.

§ 442.

R.S. 08:

§ 1130.

C.L.

§ 8614.

CSA:

C. 44, § 56.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-53.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-53.

Editor's note:

Pursuant to §§ 30-6-105 to 30-6-109, inclusive, there is recorded in the office of the clerk and recorder of Park County in book 70, page 560, and in the office of the clerk and recorder of Jefferson County in book 140, page 400 (indexed in book 2 - Miscellaneous Papers - in the office of the secretary of state), a proclamation showing attachment to Park County and detachment from Jefferson County of territory described as follows:

"Beginning at the intersection of the boundary line between Park and Jefferson Counties with the center line of the South Platte River, about two miles above Lake George, thence down the said Platte River along its center line to intersection of said center line with the Second Correction Line South, thence westerly along said Correction Line to its intersection with the boundary line between Park and Jefferson Counties, thence along said boundary line to point of beginning."

30-5-154. Phillips.

Beginning at the intersection of the south line of township six north with the east boundary line of Colorado; thence west along said township line to its intersection with the west line of range forty-seven west; thence north on said range line to its intersection with the second standard parallel north; thence east on said parallel to the southwest corner of township nine north, range forty-seven west; thence north on the west line of range forty-seven west to its intersection with the northern boundary of the southern half of township nine north; thence east on said northern boundary to its intersection with the east boundary line of Colorado; and thence south on said boundary line to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 288, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1131.

C.L.

§ 8615.

CSA:

C. 44, § 57.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-54.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-54.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1432, § 17, effective July 1.

30-5-155. Pitkin.

The county of Pitkin is hereby established, with the legal capacity and functions of other counties in this state, and with boundaries as follows:

Beginning at the point on the summit of the survey or National range where the Elk mountain range intersects the same; thence in a westerly and northwesterly direction along the summit of the Elk mountain range to Snow Mass mountain; thence due west to the divide west of Rock creek; thence along said divide in a northwesterly direction to the southern boundary of Summit county; thence east along the southern boundary of Summit county to the top of the National range being the west boundary line of Lake county; thence along the summit of said range in a southeasterly direction to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 89, § 1.

G.S.

§ 471.

R.S. 08:

§ 1132.

C.L.

§ 8616.

CSA:

C. 44, § 58.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-55.

C.R.S. 1963:

34-1-55.

30-5-156. Prowers.

Beginning at the intersection of the eastern boundary line of Colorado with the south line of township twenty-seven south; thence west on said township line to its intersection with the west line of range forty-seven west; thence north on said range line to its intersection with the fifth standard parallel south; thence east on said parallel to the southwest corner of township twenty-five south, range forty-seven west; thence north on the west line of range forty-seven west to its intersection with the fourth standard parallel south; thence east on said parallel to the eastern boundary line of Colorado; and thence south on said boundary line to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 294, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1133.

C.L.

§ 8617.

CSA:

C. 44, § 59.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-56.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-56.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1433, § 18, effective July 1.

30-5-157. Pueblo.

The boundaries of the county of Pueblo shall be as follows:

Commencing at a point on the western boundary line of said county, as heretofore constituted, where the fourth correction line south crosses the western boundary of said county, thence running due west six miles; thence due south to the summit of the Greenhorn range of mountains; thence southward along said range of mountains to the summit of the Cuerno Verde peak; thence northeast in a straight line to Corral de Toros on the Huerfano river; thence eastward to the Iron Springs; thence due east to the east line of the state; thence north along said east line of the state to a point due east of the northeast corner of said county, as heretofore constituted; thence west to the northwest corner of said county, as heretofore constituted; and thence south to the place of beginning.

Source:

R.S.

p. 164, § 46.

G.L.

§ 373.

G.S.

§ 445.

R.S. 08:

§ 1134.

C.L.

§ 8618.

CSA:

C. 44, § 60.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-57.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-57.

30-5-158. Rio Blanco.

So much of the county of Garfield as is included within the following described boundaries shall be set apart and is hereby established as a county, with the legal capacities and functions of other counties of this state, to be called the county of Rio Blanco:

Commencing at a point where the line between townships four and five south intersects the line between the state of Colorado and the territory of Utah; thence east on said township line to the southeast corner of township four south, range one hundred west; thence north three miles to the southeast corner of section thirteen, township four south, range one hundred west; thence east to the corner of sections fifteen, sixteen, twenty-one and twenty-two in township four south, range ninety-four west; thence north nine miles to the northeast corner of section four, township three south, range ninety-four west; thence east to the northeast corner of township three south, range ninety west; thence north six miles to the northeast corner of township two south, range ninety west; thence east to the eleventh guide meridian west; thence north on said eleventh guide meridian line to the base line; thence east on said base line to the southeast corner of township one north, range eighty-nine west; thence north six miles to the northeast corner of said township; thence east to the east boundary line of Garfield county; thence north to the south boundary line of Routt county; thence west on the south boundary line of Routt county to the state line; thence south on said state line to place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 325, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1135.

C.L.

§ 8619.

CSA:

C. 44, § 61.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-58.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-58.

30-5-159. Rio Grande.

Beginning at the intersection of the ninth standard parallel north with the east line of range eight east; thence north on said range line to its intersection with the tenth standard parallel north; thence west on said parallel to its intersection with the west line of range four east; thence north on said range line to its intersection with the north line of township forty-one north; thence west on said township line to its intersection with the west line of range three east; thence south on said range line to the southeast corner of township forty north, range two east; thence west on the south line of said township and range to the northwest corner of township thirty-nine north, range three east; thence south on the west line of range three east to its intersection with the ninth standard parallel north; thence east on said parallel to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the New Mexico principal meridian.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 66, § 1.

G.L.

§ 377.

L. 1879:

p. 48, § 1.

G.S.

§§ 453, 470.

R.S. 08:

§§ 1136, 1137.

C.L.

§§ 8620, 8621.

CSA:

C. 44, §§ 62, 63.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-59.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-59.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1433, § 19, effective July 1.

30-5-160. Routt.

Beginning at the intersection of the west line of range eighty-eight west with the north boundary line of Colorado; thence south on said range line to its intersection with the north line of township seven north; thence west on said township line to the section line between sections three and four in township seven north, range eighty-nine west; thence south on said section line to the northeast corner of section twenty-eight in said township seven north, range eighty-nine west; thence west along the north line of sections twenty-eight, twenty-nine, and thirty in township seven north, range eighty-nine west to its intersection with the west line of range eighty-nine west; thence south on the west line of range eighty-nine west to the southwest corner of section eighteen, township three north, range eighty-nine west; thence east on the east-west centerline of said township to the southeast corner of section sixteen in range eighty-six west; thence south on the north-south centerline of said range to the south line of township one south; thence east on said township line to its intersection with the west line of range eighty-two west; thence north along said range line to its intersection with the continental divide in township six north; thence northerly along said divide to its intersection with the north boundary line of Colorado; and thence west on said boundary line to the place of beginning. Said public land surveys are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

G.L.

§§ 393, 394.

G.S.

§§ 463, 464.

R.S. 08:

§§ 1138, 1139.

C.L.

§§ 8622, 8623.

CSA:

C. 44, §§ 64, 65.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-60.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-60.

L. 82:

Entire section R&RE, p. 480, § 1, effective July 1.

30-5-161. Saguache.

Saguache county: Commencing at the most easterly point of La Loma del Norte; thence in an easterly direction to the point where the Mosco creek enters into the San Luis Valley; thence up the center of said creek to the boundary line of Fremont county, on the summit of the Sangre de Cristo range; thence in a northwesterly direction along the summit of said range to the top of the range at the Poncho pass; thence in a direct line west to the one hundred and seventh degree of longitude; thence south, following said degree, to the north boundary line of Conejos county; thence east along the north boundary line of Conejos county to where it intersects the southwest boundary of Saguache county; thence on a produced southeasterly line to the mouth of the canyon of the snowy range, from whence flows the Rio Grande del Norte; thence down the center of said stream to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1872:

p. 81, § 1.

G.L.

§ 352.

G.S.

§ 427.

R.S. 08:

§ 1140.

C.L.

§ 8624.

CSA:

C. 44, § 66.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-61.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-61.

30-5-162. Saguache and Costilla - boundary. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 68, § 13.

G.L.

omitted.

G.S.

§ 426.

R.S. 08:

§ 1141.

C.L.

§ 8625.

CSA:

C. 44, § 67.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-62.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-62.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1434, § 22, effective July 1.